Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.390

Commercially sexually exploited children receiving center programs—Referrals.

(1) The following individuals or entities may refer a child to receiving centers as defined in RCW 7.68.380:

(a) Law enforcement, who shall:

(i) Transport a child eligible for receiving center services to a receiving center; or

(ii) Coordinate transportation with a liaison dedicated to serving commercially sexually exploited children established under RCW 74.14B.070 or a community service provider;

(b) The department of children, youth, and families;

(c) Juvenile courts;

(d) Community service providers;

(e) A parent or guardian; and

(f) A child may self-refer.

(2) Eligibility for placement in a receiving center is children ages twelve through seventeen, of all genders, who have been, or are at risk for being commercially sexually exploited.

[ 2020 c 331 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2020 c 331: See note following RCW 7.68.380.